Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-296
Notices; slander of title; damages.

No person shall use the privilege of filing notices hereunder for the purpose of slandering the title to real estate and in any action brought for the purpose of quieting title to real estate, if the court shall find that any person has filed a claim for the purpose only of slandering title to such real estate, the court shall award the plaintiff all the costs of such action, including attorney fees to be fixed and allowed to the plaintiff by the court, and all damages that plaintiff may have sustained as the result of such notice of claim having been filed for record.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 9, p. 765.

An action for slander of title is based upon a false and malicious statement, oral or written, which disparages a person's title to real or personal property and results in special damage. For slander of title claims, malice requires (1) knowledge that the statement is false or (2) reckless disregard for its truth or falsity. Wilson v. Fieldgrove, 280 Neb. 548, 787 N.W.2d 707 (2010).